Hawaii statutes.
§576B-208 Child support orders for two or
more obligees. In responding to registrations or petitions for enforcement
of two or more child support orders in effect at the same time with regard to
the same obligor and different individual obligees, at least one of which was
issued by a tribunal of another state or a foreign country, a tribunal of this
State shall enforce those orders in the same manner as if the orders had been
issued by a tribunal of this State. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next